District of Columbia statutes.
29-408.01

Authority to amend.

A nonprofit corporation may amend its articles of incorporation at any time to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles as of the effective date of the amendment or to delete a provision that is not required to be contained in the articles.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720